Louisiana, session 2026, HB38.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:81.1(B)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
14:81.1(B)(12) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§81.1. Child sexual abuse materials
* * *
B. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions shall apply:
* * *
(3) "Child sexual abuse materials" is any photograph, videotape, film,
deepfake, or other reproduction, whether electronic or otherwise, of any sexual
performance involving a child under the age of seventeen.
* * *
(12) "Deepfake" means any audio or visual media in an electronic format,
including any motion picture film or video recording, that is created, altered, or
digitally manipulated in a manner that would falsely appear to a reasonable observer
to be an authentic record of the actual speech or conduct of the individual or replace
an individual's likeness with another individual depicted in the recording.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-510 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 38
"Deepfake" does not include any material that constitutes a work of political, public
interest, or newsworthy value, including commentary, criticism, satire, or parody, or
that includes content, context, or a clear disclosure visible throughout the duration
of the recording that would cause a reasonable person to understand that the audio
or visual media is not a record of a real event.
* * *
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
renumber the Paragraphs of R.S. 14:81.1(B) so as to properly place R.S. 14:81.1(B)(12) as
enacted by this Act.